Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5502.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-1-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-1 entitled "General
Provisions" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-1-2. Felony, misdemeanor — Petty misdemeanor, and violation distinguished.
(a) Unless otherwise provided, any criminal offense which at any given time may be
punished by imprisonment for a term of more than one year, or by a fine of more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000), is declared to be a felony; any criminal offense which may be punishable by
imprisonment for a term of more than six (6) months and not exceeding one year three hundred
sixty-four (364) days, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both, is
declared to be a or solely by a fine of more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both ,is declared
to be a misdemeanor; any criminal offense which may be punishable by imprisonment for a term
not exceeding six (6) months or solely by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or
both, and not than one thousand dollars ($1,000) is declared to be a petty misdemeanor; and any
offense which may be punished by only a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) is
declared to be a violation.
(b) Whenever the phrase "one year" appears in any provision of the general or public laws
in reference to the maximum sentence of imprisonment that may be imposed, such phrase shall
mean, be interpreted as, and be applied as three hundred sixty-four (364) days.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001061
========
LC001061 - Page 2 of 3